Hawaii, session 2025, SB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 353H-32, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) through (c) to read as follows: "(a)  The department, in collaboration with the department of transportation and the examiner of drivers of each county, shall inform inmates that departmental assistance is available to obtain civil identification cards, in accordance with part XVI of chapter 286, and upon request shall assist inmates [who have one year or less prior to the inmate's parole or release date remaining on their prison sentence] in obtaining a civil identification card[.] as soon as practicable but at least one year before the inmate's parole or release date; provided that the department shall assist inmates in obtaining a civil identification card even if the department fails to meet the deadline pursuant to this subsection. (b)  The department, in collaboration with appropriate federal, state, and county agencies, shall also inform inmates of the availability of departmental assistance to obtain the inmate's birth certificate, social security card, and any other relevant identification documents necessary for the inmate to transition into the workforce, access social services, secure or verify applicable medicaid eligibility, and secure housing, and upon request shall assist the inmates [who have one year or less prior to the inmate's parole or release date.] in obtaining the identification documents as soon as practicable but at least one year before the inmate's parole or release date; provided that the department shall assist inmates in obtaining the identification documents even if the department fails to meet the deadline pursuant to this subsection. (c)  For an inmate released to work furlough, extended furlough, or community placement programs, the department [of corrections and rehabilitation] shall initiate the process of assisting the inmate pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) [at least ninety days prior to the inmate being released] by providing the forms necessary for the inmate to obtain civil identification cards and other identification documents to the inmate[.] as soon as practicable but at least ninety days before the inmate's release date; provided that the department shall provide the forms necessary for the inmate to obtain civil identification cards and other identification documents even if the department fails to meet the deadline pursuant to this subsection." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.